Georgia statutes. 
(d) (1) When a capital project is located within the boundaries of a municipality with an independent school system, a consent by the municipality under subparagraph (c)(1)(B) of this Code section shall cover the use of payments in lieu of taxes for educational purposes, provided that, if the board of education of the independent school system is empowered to set the ad valorem tax millage rate for educational purposes and the legislative body of the municipality does not have the authority to modify such rate set by the board of education, the requisite consent shall be that of the board of education of the independent school system rather than that of the legislative body of the municipality.

(2) For those municipalities which do not have an independent school system, a consent by the municipality under subparagraph (c)(1)(B) of this Code section shall cover the use of payments in lieu of taxes for educational purposes if the county board of education or the local legislative body of the county, whichever is authorized to establish the ad valorem tax millage rate for educational purposes, consents to such coverage by resolution duly adopted by said board of education or local legislative body, as appropriate.

(3) The use of payments in lieu of taxes levied for county school district purposes shall be covered by a consent under subparagraph (c)(1)(B) of this Code section if the board of education of the county school district or the local legislative body of the county, whichever is authorized to establish the ad valorem tax millage rate for educational purposes, consents to such coverage by resolution duly adopted by said board of education or local legislative body, as appropriate.

(4) The use of payments in lieu of taxes levied for school district purposes within the boundaries of a consolidated government shall be covered by a consent under subparagraph (c)(1)(B) of this Code section if the board of education of such school district or the local legislative body of the consolidated government, whichever is authorized to establish the ad valorem tax millage rate for educational purposes within the school district, consents to such coverage by resolution duly adopted by said board of education or local legislative body, as appropriate.

(e) This Code section shall not affect revenue bonds or other revenue obligations which any local government authority has issued or which have been judicially validated on or before April 22, 2009. Each county board of tax assessors shall continue, notwithstanding this Code section, to exercise its powers and discharge its duties and is specifically authorized, without limitation, to use a method or methods of valuation for leases related to revenue bonds or other revenue obligations issued by a local government authority for a capital project or projects to be leased primarily to a nongovernmental user or users, based on assessments of the increasing interest of the nongovernmental user or users in the real or personal property, or both, over the term of the lease, or to use a simplified method or methods employing a specified percentage or specified percentages of such leasehold interests. Each local government authority that is authorized to issue revenue bonds or other revenue obligations secured by a taxable property interest, such as a taxable lease of a capital project, shall continue, notwithstanding this Code section, to exercise its powers and discharge its duties, including, in the case of development authorities, the development of trade, commerce, industry, and employment opportunities. Any local government or local government authority which directly or indirectly receives payments in lieu of taxes shall be authorized to use the same for any governmental or public purpose of such local government or local government authority.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-80-16.1, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 158, § 3/HB 63.)

Annotations

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2009, "the term" was inserted in the introductory language of subsection (b) and "April 22, 2009" was substituted for "the effective date of this Code section" in the first sentence of subsection (e).

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Valuation of leasehold estates. - Trial court erred in dismissing for failure to state a claim upon which relief could be granted a taxpayer's petition seeking a declaration that the valuation method a county board of assessors and the development authority of the county used for leasehold estates arising from a local development authority sale-leaseback bond transaction was illegal and in granting the authority's motion for judgment on the pleadings because the taxpayer made material allegations that could be supported by admissible evidence on the issue of whether the valuation method fairly and justly approximated the fair market value of a bond transaction leasehold estate, and the board and authority failed to show that they were clearly entitled to judgment; although O.C.G.A. § 36-80-16.1(e) gave county boards of tax assessors authority to use simplified methods for determining the value of a bond transaction leasehold estate, the statute did not relieve the board and authority from their duty to value the leasehold estate at the estate's fair market value, and any contention that the statute did allow the board and authority to value a bond transaction leasehold estate at less than the estate's fair market value would make the statute illegal and unconstitutional. Sherman v. Fulton County Bd. of Assessors, 288 Ga. 88, 701 S.E.2d 472 (2010).

36-80-17. Authorization to contract for utility services; conditions and limitations.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term "local authority" means an instrumentality of one or more local governments created to fulfill a specialized public purpose or any other legally created organization that has authority to issue debt for a public purpose independent of a county or municipality, regardless of name; provided, however, that the term "local authority" does not include a state authority. A local authority may have been created by local constitutional amendment, general statute, or local law.

(b) The governing body of any local authority which is authorized to provide electric, natural gas, or water utility services in this state may authorize the execution of one or more contracts which specify the rates, fees, or other charges which will be charged and collected by the local authority for electric, natural gas, or water utility services to be provided by the local authority to one or more of its utility customers. Any such contract shall be subject to the following conditions and limitations:

(1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B) of this paragraph, no such contract shall be for a term in excess of ten years.

(B) No such contract for solar utility services or for wind utility services shall be for a term in excess of 20 years;

(2) Any such contract which is for a term in excess of two years shall include commercially reasonable provisions under which the rates, fees, or other charges shall be adjusted with respect to inflationary or deflationary factors affecting the provision of the utility service in question; and

(3) Any such contract shall include commercially reasonable provisions relieving the local authority from its obligations under the contract in the event that the local authority's ability to comply with the contract is impaired by war, natural disaster, catastrophe, or any other emergency creating conditions under which the local authority's compliance with the contract would become impossible or create a substantial financial burden upon the local authority or its taxpayers.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-80-17, enacted by Ga. L. 1998, p. 1113, § 3; Ga. L. 2019, p. 605, § 3/SB 95.)

Annotations

The 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, rewrote paragraph (b)(1), which read: "No such contract shall be for a term in excess of ten years;".

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in City of Atlanta v. City of College Park, 311 Ga. App. 62, 715 S.E.2d 158 (2011); City of Atlanta v. City of College Park, 292 Ga. 741, 741 S.E.2d 147 (2013).

36-80-18. Environmental assessment required prior to acquiring real property for recreational area; continuing assessment.

Statute text

(a) A county, municipality, local board of education, or public authority created by local or general law may not accept a gift of or otherwise acquire real property which is intended to be used for a park or recreational area unless, prior to such acceptance or acquisition, such political subdivision or authority retains an environmental health engineer for a phase 1 environmental assessment to examine the property for contaminants, hidden methane gas, and similar hazards which would be dangerous to public use of such property and receives a report regarding any discovered dangers. If such report discloses significant dangers, the property shall not be accepted or acquired unless the danger is eliminated; otherwise, such property may be accepted or acquired.

(b) At least every 20 years after property has been accepted or acquired pursuant to subsection (a) of this Code section, the political subdivision or authority shall retain an environmental health engineer to retest the property for hazards.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-80-18, enacted by Ga. L. 1999, p. 556, § 1.)

Annotations

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in Ware v. Henry County Water & Sewerage Auth., 258 Ga. App. 778, 575 S.E.2d 654 (2002).

36-80-19. General codification of ordinances and resolutions; publication and availability of code; official state repository for general codifications.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term "local governing authority" means the governing authority of each municipality and county in this state.

(b) (1) Each local governing authority shall, no later than January 1, 2002, provide for the general codification of all the ordinances and resolutions of that unit of local government having the force and effect of law. Except as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection, the general codification shall be adopted by such local governing authority by ordinance and shall be published promptly, together with all amendments thereto and such local Acts of the General Assembly pertaining to the governing authority, codes of technical regulations, and other rules and regulations as the local governing authority may specify. This compilation shall be known and cited officially as "The Code of ______________, Georgia."

(2) In cities having a population of 5,000 or less according to the most recent federal decennial census, the governing authority may at its discretion substitute a compilation of ordinances and resolutions for the codification required under paragraph (1) of this subsection. In such case, the compiled ordinances and resolutions shall, at a minimum, be arranged in a logical manner, such as by date, and should preferably include an index or other finding aids. In such case, the compilation shall be known as "The Compiled Ordinances and Resolutions of ______________, Georgia" and shall be distributed and made available in the same manner provided in this Code section for codifications.

(3) Copies of the code, at the discretion of the local governing authority, shall be furnished to officers, departments, and agencies of the local governing authority. The code shall be made available for purchase by the public at a reasonable price as fixed by the local governing authority. Amendments to a code shall be incorporated into the general codification and published at least annually.

(c) The local governing authority shall cause each ordinance and each amendment to the general codification to be printed promptly following its adoption, and the printed ordinances and amendments shall be made available for purchase by the public at reasonable prices to be fixed by the local governing authority. Following publication of the first code under this Code section and at all times thereafter, the ordinances and amendments shall be printed in substantially the same style as the code currently in effect in such unit of local government and shall be suitable in form for incorporation therein. The local governing authority shall make such further arrangements as deemed desirable with reproduction and distribution of any current changes in or additions to codes of technical regulations and other rules and regulations included in the code.

(d) Each such general codification shall be:

(1) Made available by posting such codification on the Internet; or

(2) In counties which have established a county law library, furnished as a copy to the county law library.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-80-19, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 865, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1219, § 4; Ga. L. 2008, p. 267, § 3/SB 482.)

Annotations

Law reviews. - For article, "Local Government Law," see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

36-80-20. Decal or seal required on vehicles owned or leased by any county, municipality, regional commission, school system, commission, board, or public authority.

Statute text

(a) Every motor vehicle which is owned or leased by any county, municipality, regional commission, county or independent school system, commission, board, or public authority or which has been purchased or leased by any public official or public employee with public funds shall have affixed to the front door on each side of such vehicle a clearly visible decal or seal containing the name of or otherwise identifying such governmental entity.

(b) The requirements of subsection (a) of this Code section shall not apply to:

(1) Any vehicle used for law enforcement or prosecution purposes; or

(2) Any vehicle owned or leased by a county, municipality, or public housing authority expressly excepted from the provisions of this Code section by ordinance or resolution adopted by the governing authority of a county, municipality, or public housing authority following a public hearing on the subject held no more than 14 days prior to the adoption of the resolution or ordinance. Any such public hearing shall be advertised one time in the legal organ of the county at least seven days prior to the hearing date. Any such exemption under this paragraph shall be for a period of no more than 12 months at a time and may be renewed annually following a public hearing as required by this paragraph and advertisement as required by this paragraph.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-80-20, enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 486, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1059, § 1; Ga. L. 2008, p. 181, § 16/HB 1216.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Operation of vehicle owned or leased by the state or any branch, department, agency, commission, board, or authority of the state unless decal or seal affixed to front door, § 50-19-2.

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2000, Code Section 36-89-1, as enacted by Ga. L. 2000, p. 486, § 1, was redesignated as Code Section 36-80-20.

Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2001, "or" was added at the end of paragraph (b)(1).

Law reviews. - For article, "Local Government Law," see 53 Mercer L. Rev. 389 (2001).

36-80-21. Definitions; electronic transmission of budgets.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term:

(1) "Audit" means an annual report of the financial affairs and transactions of a county, municipality, or consolidated government as required by Code Section 36-81-7 and an annual report of a school district as required by rule and regulation of the State Board of Education.

(2) "Budget" means:

(A) A plan of financial operation embodying an estimate of proposed expenditures during a budget period and the proposed means of financing such expenditures for a county, municipality, or consolidated government as required by Article 1 of Chapter 81 of this title and such plans of financial operation for the general fund, each special revenue fund, each debt service fund, each internal service fund, each enterprise fund, and each fiduciary fund in use by such unit of local government as such funds are defined in Code Section 36-81-2; and

(B) A plan of financial operation of a school district as required by rule and regulation of the State Board of Education and Code Section 20-2-67.

(3) "Local government" means any local school board or a governing authority of a county or municipality having an annual budget in excess of $1 million.

(4) "Vinson Institute" means the Carl Vinson Institute of Government of the University of Georgia.

(5) "Website" means a website which shall be developed, operated, and maintained by the Vinson Institute that shall allow the public to review and analyze the information identified in subsections (c) and (d) of this Code section at no cost to the public or the local governments that post to the website.

(b) Each local government shall post the information required by this Code section to the website for each fiscal year beginning on and after January 1, 2011.

(c) As soon as a local government has adopted, by ordinance or resolution, a final budget for an upcoming fiscal year, a copy of the budget shall be electronically transmitted in a Portable Document Format (PDF) file to the Vinson Institute and posted on the website by the Vinson Institute as soon as practicable. In no event shall the PDF copy of the budget be transmitted to the Vinson Institute more than 30 calendar days following the adoption of the budget ordinance or resolution.

(d) After the close of a fiscal year, a copy of the audit of each local government shall be electronically transmitted in a Portable Document Format (PDF) file to the Vinson Institute and posted on the website by the Vinson Institute as soon as practicable. The PDF copy of the audit of a county, municipality, or consolidated government shall be transmitted to the Vinson Institute concurrent with submission of the audit to the state auditor as required by subsection (d) of Code Section 36-81-7. The audit of a school district shall be transmitted to the Vinson Institute concurrent with submission of the audit to the State Board of Education as required by rule and regulation of the State Board of Education.

(e) Concurrent with the submission of the annual report by local law enforcement agencies required by subsection (g) of Code Section 9-16-19, a copy of such report shall be electronically transmitted in a Portable Document Format (PDF) file to the Vinson Institute and posted on the website by the Vinson Institute as soon as practicable.

(f) The Vinson Institute shall, subject to appropriation by the General Assembly, develop the website for use by local governments under this Code section and provide all necessary training for local government officials in its operation in order to allow local governments to upload the information required by this Code section on a timely basis at no cost to such local governments.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-80-21, enacted by Ga. L. 2010, p. 519, § 1/HB 122; Ga. L. 2011, p. 752, § 36/HB 142; Ga. L. 2014, p. 866, § 36/SB 340; Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 3-23/HB 233.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - This Code section formerly pertained to ownership of privately constructed water or sewage system, exemptions, and termination of provisions. The former Code section was based on Code 1981, § 36-80-21, enacted by Ga. L. 2007, p. 393, § 1/HB 471 and was repealed by Ga. L. 2007, p. 393, § 1/HB 471, effective January 1, 2009.

Ga. L. 2015, p. 693, § 4-1/HB 233, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2015, and shall apply to seizures of property for forfeiture that occur on or after that date. Any such seizure that occurs before July 1, 2015, shall be governed by the statute in effect at the time of such seizure."

Law reviews. - For article on the 2015 amendment of this Code section, see 32 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 1 (2015).

36-80-22. Definitions; restrictions; requirements.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term:

(1) "Agreement" means any written private contract for solid waste collection services between a firm and any commercial client.

(2) "Commercial client" means any private, nonresidential business entity or person required to have a business license who contracts with a firm for solid waste collection services.

(3) "Displacement" means the displacing of any firm's agreement by annexation, deannexation, or incorporation of a municipality.

(4) "Firm" means a private solid waste collection firm.

(5) "Governmental action" means the invalidation of any firm's existing agreement by a local government by a law, rule, or regulation, provided that such law, rule, or regulation is not enacted pursuant to an emergency as declared by the governing authority of the local government.

(6) "Local government" means a county, municipal corporation, or any county-municipal consolidated government.

(b) Prior to a firm receiving any protection under this Code section, the firm shall first establish that at least 30 days prior to the effective date of any governmental action or displacement, the firm is providing solid waste collection services in the county or municipality pursuant to an agreement.

(c) A firm's agreement with a private commercial entity or person that meets the requirements of subsection (b) of this Code section shall not be invalidated by any governmental action or displacement. This subsection shall not prevent commercial clients from discontinuing an agreement with a firm pursuant to the terms of any agreement such commercial client may have with a firm.

(d) Notwithstanding the provisions of this Code section, in order to protect the public health and safety, a local government shall have the authority to adopt local laws, rules, or regulations establishing standards and procedures for the collection and disposal of solid waste and recyclables generated by a commercial client.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-80-22, enacted by Ga. L. 2008, p. 1019, § 1/SB 154.)

36-80-23. Prohibition on immigration sanctuary policies by local governmental entities; certification of compliance.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term:

(1) "Federal officials or law enforcement officers" means any person employed by the United States government for the purpose of enforcing or regulating federal immigration laws and any peace officer certified by the Georgia Peace Officer Standards and Training Council where such federal official or peace officer is acting within the scope of his or her employment for the purpose of enforcing federal immigration laws or preserving homeland security.

(2) "Immigration status" means the legality or illegality of an individual's presence in the United States as determined by federal law.

(3) "Immigration status information" means any information, not including any information required by law to be kept confidential but otherwise including but not limited to any statement, document, computer generated data, recording, or photograph, which is relevant to immigration status or the identity or location of an individual who is reasonably believed to be illegally residing within the United States or who is reasonably believed to be involved in domestic terrorism as that term is defined in Code Section 16-4-10 or a terroristic act as that term is defined by Code Section 35-3-62.

(4) "Local governing body" means any political subdivision of this state, including any county, consolidated government, municipality, authority, school district, commission, board, or any other local public body corporate, governmental unit, or political subdivision.

(5) "Local official or employee" means any elected or appointed official, supervisor or managerial employee, contractor, agent, or certified peace officer acting on behalf of or in conjunction with a local governing body.

(6) "Sanctuary policy" means any regulation, rule, policy, or practice adopted by a local governing body which prohibits or restricts local officials or employees from communicating or cooperating with federal officials or law enforcement officers with regard to reporting immigration status information while such local official or employee is acting within the scope of his or her official duties.

(b) No local governing body, whether acting through its governing body or by an initiative, referendum, or any other process, shall enact, adopt, implement, or enforce any sanctuary policy.

(c) Any local governing body that acts in violation of this Code section shall be subject to the withholding of state funding or state administered federal funding other than funds to provide services specified in subsection (d) of Code Section 50-36-1.

(d) As a condition of funding, the Department of Community Affairs, the Department of Transportation, or any other state agency that provides funding to local governing bodies shall require certification pursuant to Code Section 50-36-4 as proof of compliance with this Code section.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-80-23, enacted by Ga. L. 2009, p. 734, § 1/SB 20; Ga. L. 2013, p. 111, § 5/SB 160; Ga. L. 2016, p. 244, § 1/SB 269.)

Annotations

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2013, p. 111, § 2/SB 160, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "It is the intent of the General Assembly that all public employers and contractors at every tier and level use the federal work authorization program on all projects, jobs, and work resulting from any bid or contract and that every public employer and contractor working for a public employer take all possible steps to ensure that a legal and eligible workforce is utilized in accordance with federal immigration and employment."

Law reviews. - For article, "State Government: Illegal Immigration Reform and Enforcement Act of 2011," see 28 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 51 (2011). For article on the 2013 amendment of this Code section, see 30 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 173 (2013).

For note, "Deference Condoning Apathy: Social Visibility in the Eleventh Circuit," see 35 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 777 (2019).

36-80-24. Limitation on elected official's or constitutional officer's use of government issued purchasing or credit cards; policy development.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term "constitutional officer" means the locally elected clerk of superior court, judge of the probate court, sheriff, tax receiver, tax collector, or tax commissioner.

(b) An elected official of a county, municipal corporation, local school system, or consolidated government or a constitutional officer shall be prohibited from the use of a government purchasing card or a government credit card unless:

(1) Such purchases are solely for items or services that directly relate to such official's or constitutional officer's public duties; and

(2) Such purchases are in accordance with guidelines adopted by the county, municipal corporation, local school system, consolidated government, or constitutional officer.

(c) Documents related to such purchases incurred by such elected officials or constitutional officers shall be available for public inspection.

(d) No such county, municipal corporation, local school system, or consolidated government shall issue government purchasing cards or government credit cards to elected officials on or after January 1, 2016, until the governing authority of such county, municipal corporation, local school system, or consolidated government, by public vote, has authorized such issuance and has promulgated specific policies regarding the use of such government purchasing cards or government credit cards. No constitutional officer shall issue government purchasing cards or government credit cards to himself, herself, or his or her employees on or after July 1, 2016, until he or she has promulgated specific policies regarding the use of such government purchasing cards or government credit cards that apply to himself or herself and his or her employees and such policies have been filed with the governing authority of the county. If an elected official of such county, municipal corporation, local school system, or consolidated government or constitutional officer promulgates specific policies regarding the use of such government purchasing cards or government credit cards, such policies shall include the following:

(1) Designation of officials who shall be authorized to be issued such government purchasing cards or government credit cards;

(2) A requirement that, before being issued a government purchasing card or government credit card, authorized users shall sign and accept an agreement with the county, municipal corporation, local school system, consolidated government, or constitutional officer issuing the government purchasing card or government credit card that such users will use such cards only in accordance with the policies of the issuing governmental entity or constitutional officer;

(3) Transaction limits for the use of such cards;

(4) A description of purchases that shall be authorized for use of such cards;

(5) A description of purchases that shall not be authorized for use of such cards;

(6) Designation of a government purchasing card or government credit card administrator;

(7) A process for auditing and reviewing purchases made with such cards; and

(8) Procedures for addressing a violation of such purchasing card or credit card policies and imposing penalties for violations, including, but not limited to, revocation of purchasing card or credit card privileges. Nothing in such procedures or any administrative action taken pursuant thereto shall preclude any other civil or criminal remedy under any other provision of law.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-80-24, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 266, § 5/HB 192; Ga. L. 2016, p. 558, § 2/HB 949.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Misuse of government issued credit cards, § 16-9-37.

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2016, "such policies" was substituted for "such, policies" in the last sentence of subsection (d).

36-80-25. Financing of public projects by local entities.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term "project" means and includes hospitals, health care facilities, dormitories, office buildings, clinics, housing accommodations, nursing homes, rehabilitation centers, extended care facilities, and other health related facilities, whether public or private.

(b) To the extent that the Constitution of Georgia permits the General Assembly by law to further define the powers and duties of any local government authority, as defined in Code Section 36-80-16, whose purpose includes the public purpose of developing or promoting trade, commerce, or industry, and to enlarge or restrict the same, each such local government authority is authorized and shall have the power to finance (by loan, grant, lease, or otherwise), refinance, construct, erect, assemble, purchase, acquire, own, repair, remodel, renovate, rehabilitate, modify, maintain, extend, improve, install, sell, equip, expand, add to, operate, or manage projects and to pay the cost of any project from the proceeds of revenue bonds of such a local government authority or any other funds of such local government authority, or from any contributions or loans by persons, corporations, limited or general partnerships, or other entities, all of which such a local government authority is authorized to receive, accept, and use. To the extent that any project serves a governmental function, the General Assembly finds and determines that such a project by its nature comprises both public and private components that are integrated so as to produce the desired public purpose and that therefore carrying out such a project is proper and authorized for such a local government authority under the Constitution of Georgia.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-80-25, enacted by Ga. L. 2015, p. 266, § 6/HB 192.)

Annotations

Cross references. - State debt, Ga. Const. 1983, Art. VII, Sec. IV.

36-80-26. Multi-county community improvement districts for transit projects.

Statute text

(a) For purposes of this Code section, the term:

(1) "County" means any county created under the Constitution or laws of this state.

(2) "Regional transit plan" means the official multiyear plan for transit services and facilities adopted pursuant to Code Section 50-39-12.

(3) "Transit" means regular, continuing shared-ride or shared-use surface transportation services that are made available by a public entity and are open to the general public or open to a segment of the general public defined by age, disability, or low income. Such term includes services or systems operated by or under contract with the state, a public agency or authority, a county or municipality, a community improvement district, or any other similar public entity of this state and all accompanying infrastructure and services necessary to provide access to these modes of transportation. Such term excludes charter or sightseeing services, school bus services, courtesy shuttle and intra-facility or terminal services, limousine carriers, and ride share network services, transportation referral services, and taxi services not paid for by a public entity.

(4) "Transit projects" means and includes purposes to establish, enhance, operate, and maintain, or improve access to transit, including general obligation debt and other multiyear obligations issued to finance such projects.

(b) A community improvement district for the purpose of the provision of transit projects which are wholly or partially located in more than one county may be created under the authority granted in and consistent with the processes set forth in Section VII of Article IX of the Georgia Constitution. Any such multi-county community improvement district may be authorized to be created upon the passage of a local act of the General Assembly by each county in which such community improvement district is to be wholly or partially located. The transit projects to be provided by such community improvement district shall be projects included in the regional transit plan and through agreement with the Atlanta-region Transit Link "ATL" Authority. The administrative body of any such community improvement district shall include one member appointed by the governing authority of each county or municipality which is located wholly or partially within such community improvement district.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-80-26, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 377, § 1-1/HB 930.)

Annotations

Effective date. - This Code section became effective January 1, 2019.

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2018, Code Section 36-80-26, as enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 926, § 1/HB 489, was redesignated as Code Section 36-80-27.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 2018, p. 377, § 5-1(c)/HB 930, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: "Tax, penalty, and interest liabilities for prior taxable years shall not be affected by the passage of Part I of this Act and shall continue to be governed by the provisions of Title 48 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated as it existed immediately prior to the effective date of Part I of this Act." Part I of the Act became effective January 1, 2019.

Administrative Rules and Regulations. - Bidding requirements for school capital outlay projects, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Education, School Facilities and Capital Outlay Management, Sec. 160-5-4-.18.

36-80-27. Advertisement of bid or proposal opportunities.

Statute text

If a bid or proposal opportunity is extended by a county, municipal corporation, or local board of education for goods, services, or both, valued at $100,000.00 or more, such bid or proposal opportunity shall be advertised by such respective local governmental entity in the Georgia Procurement Registry, as established in subsection (b) of Code Section 50-5-69, at no cost to the local governmental entity. Such bid or proposal opportunity shall be advertised on such registry for the same period of time, as set by ordinance or policy, if any, as the county, municipality, or local board of education advertises bid or proposal opportunities in the official legal organ or other media normally utilized by the local governing entity. Each advertisement shall include such details and specifications as will enable the public to know the extent and character of the bid or proposal opportunity.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-80-27, enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 926, § 1/HB 489; Ga. L. 2019, p. 283, § 1/HB 322.)

Annotations

Effective date. - This Code section became effective July 1, 2018.

The 2019 amendment, effective April 28, 2019, substituted the present provisions of this Code section for the former provisions, which read: "If a bid or proposal opportunity is extended by a county, municipal corporation, or local board of education for goods and services valued at $10,000.00 or more or if a bid or proposal opportunity is extended for public works construction contracts subject to Chapter 91 of this title, such bid or proposal opportunity shall be advertised by such respective local governmental entity in the Georgia Procurement Registry, as established in subsection (b) of Code Section 50-5-69, at no cost to the local governmental entity. Such bid opportunity may also be advertised in the official legal organ of the county, municipal corporation, or local board of education in the same manner as required by Code Section 36-91-20 or other media normally utilized by the local governmental entity when advertising bid opportunities, including the Internet website of the local governmental entity. Each advertisement shall include such details and specifications as will enable the public to know the extent and character of the bid opportunity."

Code Commission notes. - Pursuant to Code Section 28-9-5, in 2018, Code Section 36-80-26, as enacted by Ga. L. 2018, p. 926, § 1/HB 489, was redesignated as Code Section 36-80-27.

Law reviews. - For article, "Construction Law," see 70 Mercer L. Rev. 51 (2018).

36-80-28. Role of consultants; disclosures; application.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term:

(1) "Consultant" means an individual or company that is paid or engaged to develop or draft specifications or requirements for a solicitation or to serve in a consultative role during the bid or proposal evaluation or negotiation process.

(2) "Local government" means a county, municipal corporation, consolidated government, or board of education, or any authority of a county, municipal corporation, consolidated government, or board of education whether created by or pursuant to a general state law, a local act of the General Assembly, or a local constitutional amendment.

(b) Consultants who enter into contracts or arrangements with counties, municipalities, school boards, and other local governmental entities to prepare or develop specifications or requirements for bids, requests for proposals, procurement orders, or purchasing orders for such county, municipality, school board, or other local governmental entity shall, at the time of entering into such contract or arrangement, execute an agreement which provides that:

(1) The consultant shall avoid any appearance of impropriety and shall follow all policies and procedures of the county, municipality, school board, or other local governmental entity with whom the consultant is entering into contract or arrangement;
